nama.aff
SFX A Y 29
SFX A 0 ta
SFX A 0 ts
SFX A 0 i [lmnr]
SFX A 0 b [^lmnr]
SFX A 0 ni [n]
SFX A 0 mi [m]
SFX A 0 ta
SFX A 0 s
SFX A 0 s
SFX A 0 i
SFX A 0 khom
SFX A 0 kho
SFX A 0 kha
SFX A 0 m
SFX A 0 ro
SFX A 0 ra
SFX A 0 m
SFX A 0 ro
SFX A 0 ra
SFX A 0 ge
SFX A 0 go
SFX A 0 gu
SFX A 0 se
SFX A 0 so
SFX A 0 di
SFX A 0 da
SFX A 0 du
SFX A 0 in [lmnr]
SFX A 0 n [^lmnr]

SFX B Y 27
SFX B 0 ta
SFX B 0 tsa
SFX B 0 ba [^lmnr]
SFX B 0 a [lmnr]
SFX B 0 ta
SFX B 0 sa
SFX B 0 sa
SFX B 0 e
SFX B 0 khoma
SFX B 0 kho
SFX B 0 kha
SFX B 0 ma
SFX B 0 ro
SFX B 0 ra
SFX B 0 ma
SFX B 0 ro
SFX B 0 ra
SFX B 0 ge
SFX B 0 go
SFX B 0 ga
SFX B 0 se
SFX B 0 so
SFX B 0 de
SFX B 0 da
SFX B 0 do
SFX B 0 ina [lmnr]
SFX B 0 na [^lmnr]

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 a

SFX D Y 4
SFX D 0 ba
SFX D 0 sen
SFX D 0 he
SFX D 0 gu

SFX E Y 30
SFX E 0 te
SFX E 0 tsi
SFX E 0 i [lmnr]
SFX E 0 b [^lmnr]
SFX E 0 ni [n]
SFX E 0 mi [m]
SFX E 0 mi
SFX E 0 te
SFX E 0 si
SFX E 0 si
SFX E 0 i
SFX E 0 khom
SFX E 0 kho
SFX E 0 kha
SFX E 0 m
SFX E 0 ro
SFX E 0 ra
SFX E 0 ma
SFX E 0 ro
SFX E 0 ra
SFX E 0 ge
SFX E 0 go
SFX E 0 gu
SFX E 0 se
SFX E 0 so
SFX E 0 di
SFX E 0 da
SFX E 0 di
SFX E 0 an
SFX E 0 in

SFX F Y 1
SFX F 0 s

SFX G Y 3
SFX G 0 xa
SFX G 0 ’o
SFX G 0 sa

SFX H Y 2
SFX H 0 ro
SFX H 0 kara

SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 si
