nama.dic
62
ga
xā/AB
ǁaegu
ra
aiǃâ
nî
ǀî
ǃnâ
ǃoa-ai
ge
sā/A
khaoǃgâ
kai/IAB
ǃoa
ai
go
ǀkha
ǂamai
kōse
xu
hâ{ }i
ka
ǁga
ǃnâ-ū
goro
ǁî/A
ǃna
sī/A
sā
ǀnî/AB
a
ti/A
ose
ǃgâi/IAB
nau/AB
ǂama
aiǂama
ǃaroma
i
di
xōri
ta
ā/DEFCG
honder/HABG
ǂnamipe
gere
mâ/AB
ǂkhari/IAB
nē/AB
â/A
ti
khami
tawa
hâ
kara
ǂamǃnâ
ǃoagu
nî{ }ra
xa
ǃgao
khama
tī
